apertium-ces-ces.ces.dix
    <pardef n="svědomí__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>m</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>mi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="amu/r__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>r</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ři</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>rové</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ra</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rů</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ru</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rovi</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rům</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ra</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ry</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ře</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>re</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ři</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>rové</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e r="LR">
      <p>
        <l>ru</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rovi</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rech</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>rem</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ry</l>
        <r>r<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="BASE__keř">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ů</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ům</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ích</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>em</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="keř__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__keř"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Dimitrij__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__keř"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Dubaj__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/></r>
      </p>
        <par n="BASE__keř"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="noc__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>í</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ím</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ích</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>í</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>emi</l>
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="administrátor"><i>administráto</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="agresor"><i>agreso</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aligátor"><i>aligáto</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="animátor"><i>animáto</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barbar"><i>barba</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="boj"><i>boj</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bombardér"><i>bombardé</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bratr"><i>brat</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="foxteriér"><i>foxterié</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="herbář"><i>herbář</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kačer"><i>kače</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prorektor"><i>prorekto</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="převor"><i>převo</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="reportér"><i>reporté</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cracker"><i>cracke</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cypřiš"><i>cypřiš</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="dezertér"><p><l>deserté</l><r>dezerté</r></p><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="designer"><p><l>designé</l><r>designe</r></p><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diktátor"><i>diktáto</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="displej"><i>displej</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="doktor"><i>dokto</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="evangeliář"><i>evangeliář</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="exekutor"><i>exekuto</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="formulář"><i>formulář</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="groš"><i>groš</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="guvernér"><i>guverné</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="haléř"><i>haléř</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hokej"><i>hokej</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imitátor"><i>imitáto</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="instruktor"><i>instrukto</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="inventář"><i>inventář</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="junior"><i>junio</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="keř"><i>keř</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kolonizátor"><i>kolonizáto</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="komentář"><i>komentář</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="korektor"><i>korekto</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kraj"><i>kraj</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kýč"><i>kýč</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e r="LR" lm="manažer"><p><l>manage</l><r>manaže</r></p><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="meč"><i>meč</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="moderátor"><i>moderáto</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="měnič"><i>měnič</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="noc"><i>noc</i><par n="noc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="náboj"><i>náboj</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obyčej"><i>obyčej</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oltář"><i>oltář</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="organizátor"><i>organizáto</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pasažér"><i>pasažé</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pepř"><i>pepř</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plevel"><i>plevel</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pokraj"><i>pokraj</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="počasí"><i>počasí</i><par n="svědomí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pranýř"><i>pranýř</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="profesor"><i>profeso</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="propagátor"><i>propagáto</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pyj"><i>pyj</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="přijímač"><i>přijímač</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="regulátor"><i>reguláto</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="režisér"><i>režisé</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rozvoj"><i>rozvoj</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scénář"><i>scénář</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skeč"><i>skeč</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sponzor"><i>sponzo</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sprej"><i>sprej</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svědomí"><i>svědomí</i><par n="svědomí__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tahač"><i>tahač</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tisíc"><i>tisíc</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="turnaj"><i>turnaj</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="upír"><i>upí</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vypínač"><i>vypínač</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vývoj"><i>vývoj</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="čaj"><i>čaj</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
    <e lm="magistr"><i>magist</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hofer"><i>hofe</i><par n="amu/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rozprašovač"><i>rozprašovač</i><par n="keř__n"/></e>
